Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.305

Ex parte temporary protection orders—Other than for extreme risk protection orders.

(1) Where it appears from the petition and any additional evidence that the respondent has engaged in conduct against the petitioner that serves as a basis for a protection order under this chapter, and the petitioner alleges that serious immediate harm or irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued immediately without prior notice to the respondent, the court may grant an ex parte temporary protection order, pending a full hearing. The court has broad discretion to grant such relief as the court deems proper, including the forms of relief listed in RCW 7.105.310, provided that the court shall not order a form of relief listed in RCW 7.105.310 if it would not be feasible or appropriate for the respondent to comply with such a requirement before a full hearing may be held on the petition for a protection order. If the court does not order all the relief requested by the petitioner in an ex parte temporary protection order, the court shall still consider ordering such relief at the full hearing on the petition for a protection order. In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800, and order the respondent to surrender, and prohibit the respondent from accessing, having in his or her custody or control, possessing, purchasing, attempting to purchase or receive, or receiving, all firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license, as required in RCW 9.41.800.

(2) Any order issued under this section must contain the date, time of issuance, and expiration date.

(3) The court may issue an ex parte temporary protection order on the petition with or without a hearing. If an ex parte temporary protection order is denied, the court shall still set a full hearing unless the court determines the petition does not contain prima facie allegations to support the issuance of any type of protection order. If the court declines to issue an ex parte temporary protection order as requested or declines to set a hearing, the court shall state the reasons in writing. The court's denial of a motion for an ex parte temporary protection order shall be filed with the court.

(4) If a full hearing is set on a petition that is filed before close of business on a judicial day, the hearing must be set not later than 14 days from the date of the filing of the petition. If a full hearing is set on a petition that is submitted after close of business on a judicial day or is submitted on a nonjudicial day, the hearing must be set not later than 14 days from the first judicial day after the petition is filed, which may be extended for good cause.

(5) If the court does not set a full hearing, the petitioner may file an amended petition within 14 days of the court's denial. If the court determines the amended petition does not contain prima facie allegations to support the issuance of any type of protection order or if the petitioner fails to file an amended petition within the required time, the court may enter an order dismissing the petition.

(6) A petitioner may not obtain an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order against a respondent if the petitioner has previously obtained two such ex parte orders against the same respondent, but has failed to obtain the issuance of a civil antiharassment protection order, unless good cause for such failure can be shown.

[ 2022 c 268 s 16; 2021 c 215 s 38.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.